New Jersey, session 221, A5238.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services shall create a satisfaction survey to rank participating support coordination agencies.  The division shall distribute the survey to their clients who utilize the services of a support coordination agency.  The results of the survey shall be converted into a rating with a range from one to five stars.  The rating of each agency shall be updated quarterly and published on the divisions website. b.    Support coordination agency means an agency that assists in providing access to medical, social, educational, and other services for an individual with a developmental disability. 2.    This act shall take effect 90 days from the date of enactment, except that the Assistant Commissioner of the Division of Developmental Disabilities may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.